Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 8. Special Elections

§ 22-23-801.
“Special election” defined.

As used in this article, including W.S.

22-23-801

through

22-23-809

, the term “special election” means a municipal election on any question which may legally be submitted to the voters of a municipality other than at a regular municipal primary or general election or an election on the question of whether to incorporate.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-350.

§ 22-23-802.
Proclamation; supplementation of advertisement.

The date of a special election and the location of polling places shall be proclaimed by the governing body of the municipality not more than thirty (30) nor less than fifteen (15) days before the special election. The proclamation shall state the purpose of the election and shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. The advertisement may be supplemented by the county or municipality as provided by W.S. 22-20-104(b).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-351; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-23-803.
Polling places; election judges.

The governing body shall designate sufficient polling places to permit convenient voting and shall designate a sufficient number of qualified electors resident in the municipality to serve as judges of election. The judges of election at a municipal special election shall discharge the same duties as the judges of election at a regular statewide election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-352.

Cross references. —

For duties of judges of election at regular statewide elections, see §§

22-12-101

to

22-14-114

and

22-15-108

.

§ 22-23-804.
Ballots.

The municipal clerk shall provide ballots for the special election and shall deliver to each polling place ballots equal in number to the number of electors registered in the precinct plus twenty-five percent (25%).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-353; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling place” for “precinct polling place”.

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-23-805.
Poll lists.

Precinct poll lists for the special election shall be obtained by the municipal clerk from the county clerk and shall be paid for by the municipality. The municipal clerk shall furnish copies of the precinct poll lists to the judges of election. A copy of the precinct registry list shall be posted at each polling place during the special election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-354; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, twice substituted “poll lists” for “registry lists.”

The 2015 amendment,

in the third sentence,
substituted “polling place” for “precinct polling place”.

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-23-806.
Entries in and delivery of pollbook; elector not on lists.

The judges of election shall make the same entries in the pollbook as are required for statewide elections. Following the election the pollbook shall be delivered to the municipal clerk. If the name of a person offering to vote at a special municipal election is not on the poll lists, he may qualify to vote by signing an affidavit and if a judge of election obtains verification from the county clerk as provided in W.S.

22-15-105

and

22-15-106

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-355; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “poll lists” for “registry lists.”

§ 22-23-807.
Vote count and certification.

After the polls are closed, the judges of election shall count the vote and certify the result in writing to the municipal clerk.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-356; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-23-808.
Canvassing vote; tie vote.

The governing body of the municipality shall meet not later than three (3) days after the election at the time specified by the mayor to canvass the result of the special election. A tie vote shall be broken by lots cast by the governing body.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-357.

§ 22-23-809.
Certification of election results.

The governing body shall certify the result of the special election in writing and immediately post a copy of the certification in the office of the municipal clerk. The municipal clerk shall mail a copy of the proclamation to the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-358; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.